Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.28.041

Congress—Special election.

(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of representatives or the United States senate from this state, the governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy.

(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall issue a writ of election fixing a date for the primary at least seventy days after issuance of the writ, and fixing a date for the election at least seventy days after the date of the primary. If the vacancy is in the office of United States representative, the writ of election shall specify the congressional district that is vacant.

(3) If the vacancy occurs less than eight months before a general election and before the close of the filing period for that general election, the special primary and special vacancy election must be held in concert with the state primary and general election in that year.

(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal business days shall be fixed and notice thereof given to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.

(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the close of the filing period, a special primary and vacancy election to fill the position shall be held after the next general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day following the general election.

[ 2013 c 11 s 34; 2011 c 349 s 14; 2006 c 344 s 12; 2004 c 271 s 118.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.